Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.170

Publication of proposed charter.

The proposed new, altered or revised charter shall be published in the newspaper having the largest general circulation within the city at least once each week for four weeks next preceding the day of submitting the same to the electors for their approval.

[ 1985 c 469 s 23; 1965 ex.s. c 47 s 12; 1965 c 7 s 35.22.170. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 137 s 3; 1895 c 27 s 3; RRS s 8957.]

NOTES:

Publication of amendments to charter: State Constitution Art. 11 s 10 (Amendment 40).